Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2550XC (3) 91 cm/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 614.1, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 Actions may be brought within the times limited as follows, 3 respectively, after their causes accrue, and not afterwards, 4 except when otherwise specially declared , provided that such 5 time limitations may only be altered by an Act of the general 6 assembly : 7